Montana, session 2025, LC0293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 30-8-120, MCA, is amended to read:
"30-8-120. Applicability -- choice of law. (1) The local law of the issuer's jurisdiction, as specified in
subsection (4), governs:
(a) the validity of a security;
(b) the rights and duties of the issuer with respect to registration of transfer;
(c) the effectiveness of registration of transfer by the issuer;
(d) whether the issuer owes any duties to an adverse claimant to a security; and
(e) whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a person to whom transfer of a certificated
or uncertificated security is registered or a person who obtains control of an uncertificated security.
(2) The local law of the securities intermediary's entitlement holder's jurisdiction, as specified in
subsection (5), governs:
(a) acquisition of a security entitlement from the securities intermediary;
(b) the rights and duties of the securities intermediary and entitlement holder arising out of a
security entitlement;
(c) whether the securities intermediary owes any duties to an adverse claimant to a security
entitlement; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0293.1
(d) whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a person who acquires a security
entitlement from the securities intermediary or a person who purchases a security entitlement or interest therein
from an entitlement holder.
(3) The local law of the jurisdiction in which a security certificate is located at the time of delivery
governs whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a person to whom the security certificate is
delivered.
(4) "Issuer's jurisdiction" means the jurisdiction under which the issuer of the security is organized
or, if permitted by the law of that jurisdiction, the law of another jurisdiction specified by the issuer. An issuer
organized under the law of this state may specify the law of another jurisdiction as the law governing the
matters specified in subsections (1)(b) through (1)(e).
(5) The following rules determine a "securities intermediary's jurisdiction" for purposes of this
section:
(a) If an agreement between the securities intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the
securities account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the security intermediary's jurisdiction for
the purposes of this part, this chapter, or chapters 1 through 9A of this title, that jurisdiction is the securities
intermediary's jurisdiction.
(b) If subsection (5)(a) does not apply and an agreement between the securities intermediary and
its entitlement holder expressly provides that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction,
that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's jurisdiction.
(c) If neither subsection (5)(a) nor (5)(b) applies and an agreement between the securities
intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the securities account expressly provides that the securities
account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary's
jurisdiction.
(d) If subsection (5)(a), (5)(b), or (5)(c) does not apply, the securities intermediary's jurisdiction is
the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement as the office serving the entitlement
holder's account is located.
(e) If subsection (5)(a), (5)(b), (5)(c), or (5)(d) does not apply the securities intermediary's
jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the securities intermediary is located.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0293.1
(6) A securities intermediary's jurisdiction is not determined by the physical location of certificates
representing financial assets, or by the jurisdiction in which is organized the issuer of the financial asset with
respect to which an entitlement holder has a security entitlement, or by the location of facilities for data
processing or other recordkeeping concerning the account."

Section 2. Section 30-8-503, MCA, is amended to read:
"30-8-503. Property interest of entitlement holder in financial asset held by securities
intermediary. (1) To the extent necessary for a securities intermediary to satisfy all security entitlements with
respect to a particular financial asset, all interests in that financial asset held by the securities intermediary are
held by the securities intermediary for the entitlement holders, are not property of the securities intermediary,
and are not subject to claims of creditors of the securities intermediary, except as otherwise provided in 30-8-
511.
(2) An entitlement holder's property interest with respect to a particular financial asset under
subsection (1) is a pro rata property interest in all interests in that financial asset held by the securities
intermediary, without regard to the time the entitlement holder acquired the security entitlement or the time the
securities intermediary acquired the interest in that financial asset.
(3) An entitlement holder's property interest with respect to a particular financial asset under
subsection (1) may be enforced against the securities intermediary only by exercise of the entitlement holder's
rights under 30-8-505 through 30-8-508.
(4) An entitlement holder's property interest with respect to a particular financial asset under
subsection (1) may be enforced against a purchaser of the financial asset or interest therein only if:
(a) insolvency proceedings have been initiated by or against the securities intermediary;
(b) the securities intermediary does not have sufficient interests in the financial asset to satisfy the
security entitlements of all of its entitlement holders to that financial asset;
(c) the securities intermediary violated its obligations under 30-8-504 by transferring the financial
asset or interest therein to the purchaser; and
(d) the purchaser is not protected under subsection (6).
(5) The trustee or other liquidator, acting on behalf of all entitlement holders having security
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0293.1
entitlements with respect to a particular financial asset, may recover the financial asset, or interest therein, from
the purchaser. If the trustee or other liquidator elects not to pursue that right, an entitlement holder whose
security entitlement remains unsatisfied has the right to recover its interest in the financial asset from the
purchaser.
(6) An action based on the entitlement holder's property interest with respect to a particular
financial asset under subsection (1), whether framed in conversion, replevin, constructive trust, equitable lien,
or other theory, may not be asserted against any purchaser of a financial asset or interest therein who gives
value, obtains control, and does not act in collusion with the securities intermediary in violating the securities
intermediary's obligations under 30-8-504."

Section 3. Section 30-8-511, MCA, is amended to read:
"30-8-511. Priority among security interests and entitlement holders. (1) Except as otherwise
provided in subsections (2) and (3), if If a securities intermediary does not have sufficient interests in a
particular financial asset to satisfy both its obligations to entitlement holders who have security entitlements to
that financial asset and its obligation to a creditor of the securities intermediary who has a security interest in
that financial asset, the claims of entitlement holders, other than the creditor, have priority over the claim of the
creditor.
(2) A claim of a creditor of a securities intermediary who has a security interest in a financial asset
held by a securities intermediary has priority over claims of the securities intermediary's entitlement holders
who have security entitlements with respect to that financial asset if the creditor has control over the financial
asset.
(3) If a clearing corporation does not have sufficient financial assets to satisfy both its obligations
to entitlement holders who have security entitlements with respect to a financial asset and its obligation to a
creditor of the clearing corporation who has a security interest in that financial asset, the claim of the creditor
has priority over the claims of entitlement holders."

Section 4. Section 30-9A-305, MCA, is amended to read:
"30-9A-305. Law governing perfection and priority of security interests in investment property.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0293.1
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the following rules apply:
(a) While a security certificate is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs
perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in the certificated
security represented thereby.
(b) The local law of the issuer's jurisdiction as specified in 30-8-120(4) governs perfection, the
effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in an uncertificated security.
(c) The local law of the securities intermediary's jurisdiction as specified in 30-8-120(5) governs
perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a security
entitlement or securities account.
(d) (c) The local law of the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of
perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a commodity contract or commodity
account.
(2) The following rules determine a commodity intermediary's jurisdiction for purposes of this part:
(a) If an agreement between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer governing the
commodity account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction
for purposes of chapters 1 through 9A or this part, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction.
(b) If subsection (2)(a) does not apply and an agreement between the commodity intermediary and
commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that the agreement is governed by
the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction.
(c) If subsection (2)(a) or (2)(b) does not apply and an agreement between the commodity
intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that the
commodity account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the commodity
intermediary's jurisdiction.
(d) If none of the preceding subsections applies, the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction is the
jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement as the office serving the commodity customer's
account is located.
(e) If none of the preceding subsections applies, the commodity intermediary's jurisdiction is the
jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the commodity intermediary is located.
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0293.1
(3) The local law of the jurisdiction in which the debtor is located governs:
(a) perfection of a security interest in investment property by filing;
(b) automatic perfection of a security interest in investment property granted by a broker or
securities intermediary; and
(c) automatic perfection of a security interest in a commodity contract or commodity account
granted by a commodity intermediary."

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective October 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Applicability. [This act] applies to the governing local law jurisdiction of
the entitlement holder for securities and secured transactions on or after [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – ****